Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-2811.01
Unsolicited proposals; competing proposals; consideration; fee; department; powers.

(1) The procedures used by the department when evaluating an unsolicited proposal shall include a requirement that, if the department determines that there is sufficient merit to pursue an unsolicited proposal, a reasonable opportunity shall be provided for other entities to submit competing proposals for consideration. The department may charge and retain an administrative fee of not more than five hundred dollars for:

(a) The initial evaluation and detailed review of an unsolicited project proposal; and

(b) The review of any competing proposal to the unsolicited proposal.

(2) The department may:

(a) Spend money appropriated to the department for the purpose of reviewing, developing, and implementing any unsolicited proposal; and

(b) Enter into any contract for a proposal deemed by the department to be in the best interest of the State of Nebraska.

(3) It is the intent of the Legislature that the department favor any creative or innovative unsolicited proposal that will provide a material benefit to the State of Nebraska beyond the traditional procurement and project delivery methods.

Laws 2026, LB1126, § 70.
July 18, 2026